test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AL_STEM_1.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AL_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AL_STEM_1

     sçál+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sçál
     sçál+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçálga
     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál
     sçál+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçálgang
     sçál+V+DIRECT+PAST: sçálgan
     sçál+V+RELATIVE: sçáls
     sçál+V+NON_FACTIVE: sçálang
     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçálgang
     sçál+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçálganggang
     sçál+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçálgangang
     sçál+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçálgiinii
     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçálgaangaa
     sçál+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçálgaangaan
     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçáläsaa
     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçáläs
     sçál+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçáläsaang
     sçál+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçáläsga
     sçál+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçáläsaas
     sçál+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçáläsaa.ang
     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasa'áa
     sçál+V+NEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasa'áang
     sçál+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasaasdláa
     sçál+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasaasdláang
     sçál+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçál'uuj
     sçál+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'uujang
     sçál+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçáläsaa'uujang
     sçál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçál'us
     sçál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçál'ujaa
     sçál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'uujaangaa
     sçál+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçáläsaa'us
     sçál+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçáläsaa'ahlans
     sçál+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçáläseehl
     sçál+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sçál'uu
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçál'waa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'waa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'waang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sçál'wägan
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçál'aawaa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sçál'aawaan
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sçál'waas
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçál'aawaas
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'waa.ang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'aawaa.ang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçálgang'waa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçálgang'waang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçálgang'waa.ang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'wägiinii
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'wägaangaa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'wägaangaan
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçál'waaäsaa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçál'waaäs
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçál'waaäsaang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçál'waaäsga
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçál'waaäsaas
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'waaäsaa.ang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçál'waa'uuj
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'waa'uujang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçál'waaäsaa'uujang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçál'waa'us
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçál'waa'ujaa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'waa'uujaangaa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçál'waaäsaa'us
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçál'waa'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sçál'waa'ahlanggan
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçál'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçál'waa'ahlans
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçál'aawaa'ahlang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçál'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçál'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sçál'waa'ahl
     sçál+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçál'waaäseehl
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sçál'ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçál'angga
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'anggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: sçál'anggan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçál'aangaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: sçál'aangaan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: sçál'ans
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçál'aangaas
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'angang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'aangaa.ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçál'anggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçálgang'anggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçálgang'angang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'anggiinii
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'anggaangaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'anggaangaan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçál'angäsaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçál'angäs
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçál'angäsaang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçál'angäsga
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçál'angäsaas
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'angäsaa.ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasaa'áng
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasaa'ánggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasaasdlä'áng
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçálang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'uuj
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'uujang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçál'angäsaa'uujang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'us
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçál'ang'ujaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'ang'uujaangaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçál'angäsaa'us
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçál'aang'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: sçál'aang'ahlanggan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'aang'ahlanggiinii
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçál'angäsaa'ahlans
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçál'aang'ahlans
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçál'aangaa'ahlang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçál'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçál'aangaa'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: sçál'aang'ahl
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçál'angäseehl
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sçál'ang'uu
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'waa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'waa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'waang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sçál'ang'wägan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçál'ang'aawaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sçál'ang'aawaan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sçál'ang'waas
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçál'ang'aawaas
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'ang'waa.ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'ang'aawaa.ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçálgang'ang'waa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçálgang'ang'waang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçálgang'ang'waa.ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'ang'wägiinii
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'ang'wägaangaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'ang'wägaangaan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçál'ang'waaäsaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçál'ang'waaäs
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçál'ang'waaäsaang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçál'ang'waaäsga
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçál'ang'waaäsaas
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçál'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçál'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'waa'uuj
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'waa'uujang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçál'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçál'ang'waa'us
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçál'ang'waa'ujaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçál'ang'waaäsaa'us
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçál'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sçál'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçál'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçál'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçál'ang'waa'ahlans
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçál'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçál'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçál'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sçál'ang'waa'ahl
     sçál+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçál'ang'waaäseehl
